Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-301
Endowments authorized.

Any person or corporation, private or municipal, or the state, any city, any county or subdivision thereof, owning or managing any cemetery, mausoleum or burial place in this state, is hereby authorized and empowered to receive by gift, grant, deed of conveyance, bequest or devise, money, stocks, bonds, or other valuable income-producing personal property, or any real estate, from any person, firm or corporation, for the purpose of endowing such cemetery, mausoleum, or burial place with a permanent fund, for any lawful purpose, the income from which shall be used for the exclusive benefits and purposes, and in the manner designated by the endower.

Laws 1915, c. 173, § 1, p. 357;

C.S.1922, § 415;

C.S.1929, § 13-301;

R.S.1943, § 12-301.